Illinois, session 104th, SB3965.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Utilities Act is amended by changing 5Sections 13-102, 13-103, and 13-406.1 as follows: 6    (220 ILCS 5/13-102)  (from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 13-102)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2030)8    Sec. 13-102. Findings. With respect to telecommunications 9services, as herein defined, the General Assembly finds that:10        (a) universally available and widely affordable 11    telecommunications services are essential to the health, 12    welfare and prosperity of all Illinois citizens;13        (b) federal regulatory and judicial rulings in the 14    1980s caused a restructuring of the telecommunications 15    industry and opened some aspects of the industry to 16    competitive entry, thereby necessitating revision of State 17    telecommunications regulatory policies and practices;18        (c) revisions in telecommunications regulatory 19    policies and practices in Illinois beginning in the 20    mid-1980s brought the benefits of competition to consumers 21    in many telecommunications markets, but not in local 22    exchange telecommunications service markets;23        (d) the federal Telecommunications Act of 1996   SB3965- 2 -LRB104 20561 AAS 34040 b1    established the goal of opening all telecommunications 2    service markets to competition and accords to the states 3    the responsibility to establish and enforce policies 4    necessary to attain that goal;5        (e) it is in the immediate interest of the People of 6    the State of Illinois for the State to exercise its rights 7    within the new framework of federal telecommunications 8    policy to ensure that the economic benefits of competition 9    in all telecommunications service markets are realized as 10    effectively as possible;11        (f) the competitive offering of all telecommunications 12    services will increase innovation and efficiency in the 13    provision of telecommunications services and may lead to 14    reduced prices for consumers, increased investment in 15    communications infrastructure, the creation of new jobs, 16    and the attraction of new businesses to Illinois;17        (g) protection of the public interest requires changes 18    in the regulation of telecommunications carriers and 19    services to ensure, to the maximum feasible extent, the 20    reasonable and timely development of effective competition 21    in all telecommunications service markets;22        (h) Illinois residents rely on today's modern wired 23    and wireless Internet Protocol (IP) networks and services 24    to improve their lives by connecting them to school and 25    college degrees, work and job opportunities, family and 26    friends, information, and entertainment, as well as   SB3965- 3 -LRB104 20561 AAS 34040 b1    emergency responders and public safety officials; Illinois 2    businesses rely on these modern IP networks and services 3    to compete in a global marketplace by expanding their 4    customer base, managing inventory and operations more 5    efficiently, and offering customers specialized and 6    personalized products and services; without question, 7    Illinois residents and our State's economy rely profoundly 8    on the modern wired and wireless IP networks and services 9    in our State;10        (i) the transition from 20th century traditional 11    circuit switched and other legacy telephone services to 12    modern 21st century next generation Internet Protocol (IP) 13    services is taking place at an extraordinary pace as 14    Illinois consumers are upgrading to home communications 15    service using IP technology, including high speed 16    Internet, Voice over Internet Protocol, and wireless 17    service;18        (j) this rapid transition to IP-based communications 19    has dramatically transformed the way people communicate 20    and has provided significant benefits to consumers in the 21    form of innovative functionalities resulting from the 22    seamless convergence of voice, video, and text, benefits 23    realized by the General Assembly when it chose to 24    transition its own telecommunications system to an all IP 25    communications network in 2016;26        (k) the benefits of the transition to IP-based   SB3965- 4 -LRB104 20561 AAS 34040 b1    networks and services were also recognized by the General 2    Assembly in 2015 through the enactment of legislation 3    requiring that every 9-1-1 emergency system in Illinois 4    provide Next Generation 9-1-1 service by July 1, 2020, and 5    requiring that the Next Generation 9-1-1 network must be 6    an IP-based platform; and7        (l) completing the transition to all IP-based networks 8    and technologies is in the public interest because it will 9    promote continued innovation, consumer benefits, increased 10    efficiencies, and increased investment in IP-based 11    networks and services; . 12        (m) a consumer-led transition to IP-based networks is 13    the best way to transition to those networks;14        (n) the health and safety of Illinois residents is of 15    the utmost importance and, until the health and safety of 16    Illinois residents can be assured, it is prudent to ensure 17    that traditional circuit switched networks are maintained 18    by telecommunications carriers until at least December 31, 19    2031; and20        (o) traditional circuit switched networks were built 21    under rate-of-return regulations where telecommunications 22    carriers were reimbursed by their customers equal to the 23    telecommunications carriers' just and reasonable 24    investments in the traditional circuit switched networks 25    plus a profit; once the health and safety of Illinois 26    residents is assured and traditional circuit switched   SB3965- 5 -LRB104 20561 AAS 34040 b1    networks are retired, it is the policy of this State that 2    the salvage value of the traditional circuit switched 3    networks be returned to Illinois residents. 4(Source: P.A. 100-20, eff. 7-1-17.) 5    (220 ILCS 5/13-103)  (from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 13-103)6    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2030)7    Sec. 13-103. Policy. Consistent with its findings, the 8General Assembly declares that it is the policy of the State of 9Illinois that:10        (a) telecommunications services should be available to 11    all Illinois citizens at just, reasonable, and affordable 12    rates and that such services should be provided as widely 13    and economically as possible in sufficient variety, 14    quality, quantity and reliability to satisfy the public 15    interest;16        (b) consistent with the protection of consumers of 17    telecommunications services and the furtherance of other 18    public interest goals, competition in all 19    telecommunications service markets should be pursued as a 20    substitute for regulation in determining the variety, 21    quality and price of telecommunications services and that 22    the economic burdens of regulation should be reduced to 23    the extent possible consistent with the furtherance of 24    market competition and protection of the public interest;25        (c) all necessary and appropriate modifications to   SB3965- 6 -LRB104 20561 AAS 34040 b1    State regulation of telecommunications carriers and 2    services should be implemented without unnecessary 3    disruption to the telecommunications infrastructure system 4    or to consumers of telecommunications services and that it 5    is necessary and appropriate to establish rules to 6    encourage and ensure orderly transitions in the 7    development of markets for all telecommunications 8    services;9        (d) the consumers of telecommunications services and 10    facilities provided by persons or companies subject to 11    regulation pursuant to this Act and Article should be 12    required to pay only reasonable and non-discriminatory 13    rates or charges and that in no case should rates or 14    charges for non-competitive telecommunications services 15    include any portion of the cost of providing competitive 16    telecommunications services, as defined in Section 13-209, 17    or the cost of any nonregulated activities;18        (e) the regulatory policies and procedures provided in 19    this Article are established in recognition of the 20    changing nature of the telecommunications industry and 21    therefore should be subject to systematic legislative 22    review to ensure that the public benefits intended to 23    result from such policies and procedures are fully 24    realized;25        (f) development of and prudent investment in advanced 26    telecommunications services and networks that foster   SB3965- 7 -LRB104 20561 AAS 34040 b1    economic development of the State should be encouraged 2    through the implementation and enforcement of policies 3    that promote effective and sustained competition in all 4    telecommunications service markets; and5        (g) completion of the transition to modern IP-based 6    networks should be encouraged through relief from the 7    outdated regulations that require continued investment in 8    legacy circuit switched networks from which Illinois 9    consumers have largely transitioned, while at the same 10    time ensuring that consumers have access to available 11    alternative services that provide quality voice service 12    and access to emergency communications; . 13        (h) a consumer-led transition to IP-based networks is 14    the best way to transition to those networks; and15        (i) the health and safety of Illinois residents is of 16    the utmost importance and, until the health and safety of 17    Illinois residents can be assured, it is prudent to ensure 18    that traditional circuit switched networks are maintained 19    by telecommunications carriers until at least December 31, 20    2031. 21(Source: P.A. 100-20, eff. 7-1-17.) 22    (220 ILCS 5/13-406.1)23    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2030)24    Sec. 13-406.1. Large Electing Provider transition to 25IP-based networks and service.  SB3965- 8 -LRB104 20561 AAS 34040 b1    (a) As used in this Section:2    "Alternative voice service" means service that includes 3all of the applicable functionalities for voice telephony 4services described in 47 CFR 54.101(a).5    "Existing customer" means a residential customer of the 6Large Electing Provider who is subscribing to a 7telecommunications service on the date the Large Electing 8Provider sends its notice under paragraph (1) of subsection 9(c) of this Section of its intent to cease offering and 10providing service. For purposes of this Section, a residential 11customer of the Large Electing Provider whose service has been 12temporarily suspended, but not finally terminated as of the 13date that the Large Electing Provider sends that notice, shall 14be deemed to be an "existing customer".15    "Large Electing Provider" means an Electing Provider, as 16defined in Section 13-506.2 of this Act, that (i) reported in 17its annual competition report for the year 2016 filed with the 18Commission under Section 13-407 of this Act and 83 Ill. Adm. 19Code 793 that it provided at least 700,000 access lines to end 20users; and (ii) is affiliated with a provider of commercial 21mobile radio service, as defined in 47 CFR 20.3, as of January 221, 2017.23    "New customer" means a residential customer who is not 24subscribing to a telecommunications service provided by the 25Large Electing Provider on the date the Large Electing 26Provider sends its notice under paragraph (1) of subsection   SB3965- 9 -LRB104 20561 AAS 34040 b1(c) of this Section of its intent to cease offering and 2providing that service.3    "Provider" includes every corporation, company, 4association, firm, partnership, and individual and their 5lessees, trustees, or receivers appointed by a court that sell 6or offer to sell an alternative voice service.7    "Reliable access to 9-1-1" means access to 9-1-1 that 8complies with the applicable rules, regulations, and 9guidelines established by the Federal Communications 10Commission and the applicable provisions of the Emergency 11Telephone System Act and implementing rules.12    "Willing provider" means a provider that voluntarily 13participates in the request for service process.14    (b) Beginning June 30, 2017, a Large Electing Provider 15may, to the extent permitted by and consistent with federal 16law, including, as applicable, approval by the Federal 17Communications Commission of the discontinuance of the 18interstate-access component of a telecommunications service, 19cease to offer and provide a telecommunications service to an 20identifiable class or group of customers, other than voice 21telecommunications service to residential customers or a 22telecommunications service to a class of customers under 23subsection (b-5) of this Section, upon 60 days' notice to the 24Commission and affected customers.25    (b-5) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in 26this Section 13-406.1, beginning December 31, 2021, a Large   SB3965- 10 -LRB104 20561 AAS 34040 b1Electing Provider may, to the extent permitted by and 2consistent with federal law, including, if applicable, 3approval by the Federal Communications Commission of the 4discontinuance of the interstate-access component of a 5telecommunication service, cease to offer and provide a 6telecommunications service to one or more of the following 7classes or groups of customers upon 60 days' notice to the 8Commission and affected customers: (1) electric utilities, as 9defined in Section 16-102 of this Act; (2) public utilities, 10as defined in Section 3-105 of this Act, that offers natural 11gas or water services; (3) electric, gas, and water utilities 12that are excluded from the definition of public utility under 13paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Section 3-105 of this Act; 14(4) water companies as described in paragraph (2) of 15subsection (b) of Section 3-105 of this Act; (5) natural gas 16cooperatives as described in paragraph (4) of subsection (b) 17of Section 3-105 of this Act; (6) electric cooperatives as 18defined in Section 3-119 of this Act; (7) entities engaged in 19the commercial generation of electric power and energy; (8) 20the functional divisions of public agencies, as defined in 21Section 2 of the Emergency Telephone System Act, that provide 22police or firefighting services; and (9) 9-1-1 Authorities, as 23defined in Section 2 of the Emergency Telephone System Act; 24provided that the date shall be extended to December 21, 2022, 25for (i) an electric utility, as defined in Section 16-102 of 26this Act, that serves more than 3 million customers in the   SB3965- 11 -LRB104 20561 AAS 34040 b1State; and (ii) an entity engaged in the commercial generation 2of electric power and energy that operates one or more nuclear 3power plants in the State. 4    (c) Beginning June 30, 2017, a Large Electing Provider 5may, to the extent permitted by and consistent with federal 6law, cease to offer and provide voice telecommunications 7service to an identifiable class or group of residential 8customers, which, for the purposes of this subsection (c), 9shall be referred to as "requested service", subject to 10compliance with the following requirements:11        (1) No less than 255 days prior to providing notice to 12    the Federal Communications Commission of its intent to 13    discontinue the interstate-access component of the 14    requested service, the Large Electing Provider shall:15            (A) file a notice of the proposed cessation of the 16        requested service with the Commission, which shall 17        include a statement that the Large Electing Provider 18        will comply with any service discontinuance rules and 19        regulations of the Federal Communications Commission 20        pertaining to compatibility of alternative voice 21        services with medical monitoring devices; and22            (B) provide notice of the proposed cessation of 23        the requested service to each of the Large Electing 24        Provider's existing customers within the affected 25        geographic area by first-class mail separate from 26        customer bills. If the customer has elected to receive   SB3965- 12 -LRB104 20561 AAS 34040 b1        electronic billing, the notice shall be sent 2        electronically and by first-class mail separate from 3        customer bills. The notice provided under this 4        subparagraph (B) shall describe the requested service, 5        identify the earliest date on which the Large Electing 6        Provider intends to cease offering or providing the 7        telecommunications service, provide a telephone number 8        by which the existing customer may contact a service 9        representative of the Large Electing Provider, and 10        provide a telephone number by which the existing 11        customer may contact the Commission's Consumer 12        Services Division. The notice shall also include the 13        following statement in English and in Spanish:14                "If you do not believe that an alternative 15            voice service including reliable access to 9-1-1 16            is available to you, from either [name of Large 17            Electing Provider] or another provider of wired or 18            wireless voice service where you live, you have 19            the right to request the Illinois Commerce 20            Commission to investigate the availability of 21            alternative voice service including reliable 22            access to 9-1-1. To do so, you must submit such a 23            request either in writing or by signing and 24            returning a copy of this notice, no later than 25            (insert date), 60 days after the date of the 26            notice to the following address:  SB3965- 13 -LRB104 20561 AAS 34040 b1            Chief Clerk of the Illinois Commerce Commission2            527 East Capitol Avenue3            Springfield, Illinois 627064                You must include in your request a reference 5            to the notice you received from [Large Electing 6            Provider's name] and the date of notice.".7            Thirty days following the date of notice, the 8        Large Electing Provider shall provide each customer to 9        which the notice was sent a follow-up notice 10        containing the same information and reminding 11        customers of the deadline for requesting the 12        Commission to investigate alternative voice service 13        with access to 9-1-1.14        (2) After June 30, 2017, and only in a geographic area 15    for which a Large Electing Provider has provided notice of 16    proposed cessation of the requested service to existing 17    customers under paragraph (1) of this subsection (c), an 18    existing customer of that provider may, within 60 days 19    after issuance of such notice, request the Commission to 20    investigate the availability of alternative voice service 21    including reliable access to 9-1-1 to that customer. For 22    the purposes of this paragraph (2), existing customers who 23    make such a request are referred to as "requesting 24    existing customers". The Large Electing Provider may cease 25    to offer or provide the requested service to existing 26    customers who do not make a request for investigation   SB3965- 14 -LRB104 20561 AAS 34040 b1    beginning 30 days after issuance of the notice required by 2    paragraph (5) of this subsection (c).3            (A) In response to all requests and investigations 4        under this paragraph (2), the Commission shall conduct 5        a single investigation to be commenced 75 days after 6        the receipt of notice under paragraph (1) of this 7        subsection (c), and completed within 135 days after 8        commencement. The Commission shall, within 135 days 9        after commencement of the investigation, make one of 10        the findings described in subdivisions (i) and (ii) of 11        this subparagraph (A) for each requesting existing 12        customer.13                (i) If, as a result of the investigation, the 14            Commission finds that service from at least one 15            provider offering alternative voice service 16            including reliable access to 9-1-1 through any 17            technology or medium is available to one or more 18            requesting existing customers, the Commission 19            shall declare by order that, with respect to each 20            requesting existing customer for which such a 21            finding is made, the Large Electing Provider may 22            cease to offer or provide the requested service 23            beginning 30 days after the issuance of the notice 24            required by paragraph (5) of this subsection (c).25                (ii) If, as a result of the investigation, the 26            Commission finds that service from at least one   SB3965- 15 -LRB104 20561 AAS 34040 b1            provider offering alternative voice service, 2            including reliable access to 9-1-1, through any 3            technology or medium is not available to one or 4            more requesting existing customers, the Commission 5            shall declare by order that an emergency exists 6            with respect to each requesting existing customer 7            for which such a finding is made.8            (B) If the Commission declares an emergency under 9        subdivision (ii) of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph 10        (2) with respect to one or more requesting existing 11        customers, the Commission shall conduct a request for 12        service process to identify a willing provider of 13        alternative voice service including reliable access to 14        9-1-1. A provider shall not be required to participate 15        in the request for service process. The willing 16        provider may utilize any form of technology that is 17        capable of providing alternative voice service 18        including reliable access to 9-1-1, including, without 19        limitation, Voice over Internet Protocol services and 20        wireless services. The Commission shall, within 45 21        days after the issuance of an order finding that an 22        emergency exists, make one of the determinations 23        described in subdivisions (i) and (ii) of this 24        subparagraph (B) for each requesting existing customer 25        for which an emergency has been declared.26                (i) If the Commission determines that another   SB3965- 16 -LRB104 20561 AAS 34040 b1            provider is willing and capable of providing 2            alternative voice service including reliable 3            access to 9-1-1 to one or more requesting existing 4            customers for which an emergency has been 5            declared, the Commission shall declare by order 6            that, with respect to each requesting existing 7            customer for which such a determination is made, 8            the Large Electing Provider may cease to offer or 9            provide the requested service beginning 30 days 10            after the issuance of the notice required by 11            paragraph (5) of this Section.12                (ii) If the Commission determines that for one 13            or more of the requesting existing customers for 14            which an emergency has been declared there is no 15            other provider willing and capable of providing 16            alternative voice service including reliable 17            access to 9-1-1, the Commission shall issue an 18            order requiring the Large Electing Provider to 19            provide alternative voice service including 20            reliable access to 9-1-1 to each requesting 21            existing customer utilizing any form of technology 22            capable of providing alternative voice service 23            including reliable access to 9-1-1, including, 24            without limitation, continuation of the requested 25            service, Voice over Internet Protocol services, 26            and wireless services, until another willing   SB3965- 17 -LRB104 20561 AAS 34040 b1            provider is available. A Large Electing Provider 2            may fulfill the requirement through an affiliate 3            or another provider. The Large Electing Provider 4            may request that such an order be rescinded upon a 5            showing that an alternative voice service 6            including reliable access to 9-1-1 has become 7            available to the requesting existing customer from 8            another provider.9        (3) If the Commission receives no requests for 10    investigation from any existing customer under paragraph 11    (2) of this subsection (c) within 60 days after issuance 12    of the notice under paragraph (1) of this subsection (c), 13    the Commission shall provide written notice to the Large 14    Electing Provider of that fact no later than 75 days after 15    receipt of notice under paragraph (1) of this subsection 16    (c). Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection (c) 17    to the contrary, if no existing customer requests an 18    investigation under paragraph (2) of this subsection (c), 19    the Large Electing Provider may immediately provide the 20    notice to the Federal Communications Commission as 21    described in paragraph (4) of this subsection (c).22        (4) At the same time that it provides notice to the 23    Federal Communications Commission of its intent to 24    discontinue the interstate-access component of the 25    requested service, the Large Electing Provider shall:26            (A) file a notice of proposal to cease to offer and   SB3965- 18 -LRB104 20561 AAS 34040 b1        provide the requested service with the Commission; and2            (B) provide a notice of proposal to cease to offer 3        and provide the requested service to existing 4        customers and new customers receiving the service at 5        the time of the notice within each affected geographic 6        area, with the notice made by first-class mail or 7        within customer bills delivered by mail or equivalent 8        means of notice, including electronic means if the 9        customer has elected to receive electronic billing. 10        The notice provided under this subparagraph (B) shall 11        include a brief description of the requested service, 12        the date on which the Large Electing Provider intends 13        to cease offering or providing the telecommunications 14        service, and a statement as required by 47 CFR 63.71 15        that describes the process by which the customer may 16        submit comments to the Federal Communications 17        Commission.18        (5) Upon approval by the Federal Communications 19    Commission of its request to discontinue the 20    interstate-access component of the requested service and 21    subject to the requirements of any order issued by the 22    Commission under subdivision (ii) of subparagraph (B) of 23    paragraph (2) of this subsection (c), the Large Electing 24    Provider may immediately cease to offer the requested 25    service to all customers not receiving the service on the 26    date of the Federal Communications Commission's approval   SB3965- 19 -LRB104 20561 AAS 34040 b1    and may cease to offer and provide the requested service 2    to all customers receiving the service at the time of the 3    Federal Communications Commission's approval upon 30 days' 4    notice to the Commission and affected customers. Notice to 5    affected customers under this paragraph (5) shall be 6    provided by first-class mail separate from customer bills. 7    The notice provided under this paragraph (5) shall 8    describe the requested service, identify the date on which 9    the Large Electing Provider intends to cease offering or 10    providing the telecommunications service, and provide a 11    telephone number by which the existing customer may 12    contact a service representative of the Large Electing 13    Provider.14        (6) The notices provided for in paragraph (1) of this 15    subsection (c) are not required as a prerequisite for the 16    Large Electing Provider to cease to offer or provide a 17    telecommunications service in a geographic area where 18    there are no residential customers taking service from the 19    Large Electing Provider on the date that the Large 20    Electing Provider files notice to the Federal 21    Communications Commission of its intent to discontinue the 22    interstate-access component of the requested service in 23    that geographic area.24        (7) For a period of 45 days following the date of a 25    notice issued under paragraph (5) of this Section, an 26    existing customer (i) who is located in the affected   SB3965- 20 -LRB104 20561 AAS 34040 b1    geographic area subject to that notice; (ii) who was 2    receiving the requested service as of the date of the 3    Federal Communications Commission's approval of the Large 4    Electing Provider's request to discontinue the 5    interstate-access component of the requested service; 6    (iii) who did not make a timely request for investigation 7    under paragraph (2) of this subsection (c); and (iv) whose 8    service will be or has been discontinued under paragraph 9    (5), may request assistance from the Large Electing 10    Provider in identifying providers of alternative voice 11    service including reliable access to 9-1-1. Within 15 days 12    of the request, the Large Electing Provider shall provide 13    the customer with a list of alternative voice service 14    providers. 15        (8) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, 16    except as expressly authorized by this subsection (c), the 17    Commission may not, upon its own motion or upon complaint, 18    investigate, suspend, disapprove, condition, or otherwise 19    regulate the cessation of a telecommunications service to 20    an identifiable class or group of customers once initiated 21    by a Large Electing Provider under subsection (b) or (b-5) 22    of this Section or this subsection (c). 23        (9) Notwithstanding any other provision of this 24    Section, a Large Electing Provider shall provide 25    telecommunications service, including telecommunications 26    service over traditional circuit switched networks, to   SB3965- 21 -LRB104 20561 AAS 34040 b1    existing business and residential end-use customers until 2    at least December 31, 2031.3        (10) Beginning January 1, 2032, a Large Electing 4    Provider shall start the process of returning the salvage 5    value of traditional circuit switched networks to the 6    people of this State. The Large Electing Provider shall 7    complete the salvage of the Large Electing Provider's 8    traditional circuit switched networks by January 1, 2038. 9    The Large Electing Provider shall document and report to 10    the Department of Public Health and the Commission, on a 11    quarterly basis, activities related to the salvage of the 12    Large Electing Provider's traditional circuit switched 13    networks, including, but not limited to, the total 14    realized salvage value, a per-mile salvage value, the 15    geographic location of all salvages, and the value of such 16    salvages.17        For the purposes of this Section, "salvage value" 18    means the monetary value received by a Large Electing 19    Provider for the components of a traditional circuit 20    switched network, including, but not limited to, the 21    copper wiring comprising the traditional circuit switched 22    network, once the traditional circuit switched network is 23    no longer in use. 24        (11) If a Large Electing Provider retires a 25    traditional circuit switched network, the Large Electing 26    Provider shall, beginning on January 1, 2032 and annually   SB3965- 22 -LRB104 20561 AAS 34040 b1    thereafter, transfer the salvage value of the retired 2    network to the Lead Service Line Replacement Fund for the 3    sole purpose of providing grants to municipal and private 4    water utilities to replace lead service lines.5(Source: P.A. 100-20, eff. 7-1-17; 100-719, eff. 8-3-18.) 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.